Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 4. Right of Way

§ 1046.
Vehicle approaching or entering intersection.

When two vehicles approach or enter an intersection from different highways at approximately the same time, the driver of the vehicle on the left shall yield the right of way to the vehicle on the right.

The right-of-way rule declared in subsection (a) of this section is modified at through highways as otherwise provided in this chapter and as follows:

Whenever enforcement officers are present they have the full power to regulate traffic.

Operators shall approach and enter intersecting highways slowly, with due care to avoid crashes.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 177.

§ 1047.
Vehicle turning left.

The driver of a vehicle intending to turn to the left within an intersection or into an alley, private road, or driveway shall yield the right of way to any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction that is either within the intersection or so close as to constitute an immediate hazard.

A person operating a vehicle shall not turn left unless the turn can be made at a safe distance from a vulnerable user. A person who violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $200.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 42.

§ 1048.
Stop or yield intersections.

Preferential right of way at an intersection may be indicated by “stop” signs or “yield” signs.

Except when directed to proceed by an enforcement officer or traffic-control signal, every driver of a vehicle approaching a stop intersection indicated by a stop sign shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or, if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering the intersection. After having stopped, the driver shall yield the right of way to any vehicle that has entered the intersection from another highway or that is approaching so closely on said highway as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time when such driver is moving across or within the intersection.

The driver of a vehicle approaching a yield sign shall in obedience to the yield sign slow down to a speed reasonable for the existing conditions and, if required for safety to stop, shall stop before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or, if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway. After slowing or stopping, the driver shall yield the right of way to any vehicle in the intersection or approaching on another highway so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time the driver is moving across or within the intersection. However, if the driver is involved in a collision with a vehicle in the intersection, after driving past a yield sign without stopping, the collision shall be deemed prima facie evidence of the driver’s failure to yield right of way.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

1995, No. 73

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 1049.
Vehicle entering from private road.

The driver of a vehicle about to enter or cross a highway from an alley, building, private road, or driveway shall yield the right of way to all vehicles and vulnerable users approaching on the highway.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 41.

§ 1050.
Operation on approach of law enforcement and emergency vehicles or when approaching stationary law enforcement and emergency vehicles or work zone.

Approach of law enforcement and emergency vehicles. Upon the approach of a law enforcement vehicle sounding a siren or displaying a blue or blue and white signal lamp, or both, or upon the approach of an ambulance, fire apparatus, vehicle operated by a volunteer firefighter, EMS personnel, or motor vehicle used in rescue operations as set forth in section 1252 of this title sounding a siren or displaying a red or red and white signal lamp, or both, all other vehicles shall pull to the right of the lane of traffic and come to a complete stop until the law enforcement or emergency vehicle has passed.

Approaching law enforcement, emergency, and towing and repair vehicles. The operator of a vehicle approaching a stationary law enforcement vehicle displaying a blue or blue and white signal lamp; a stationary ambulance, fire apparatus, vehicle operated by a volunteer firefighter, or motor vehicle used in rescue operations as set forth in section 1252 of this title displaying a red or red and white signal lamp; or a stationary towing and repair vehicle displaying an amber signal lamp shall proceed with caution and, if traveling on a multilane highway and safety conditions permit, make a lane change into a lane farther away from the stationary vehicle. If the operator of the approaching vehicle must remain in the lane adjacent to the stationary vehicle, then the operator shall slow down to a reasonable, safe, and prudent speed given the safety conditions and posted speed limit.

Approaching work zone. The operator of a vehicle approaching a properly designated work zone shall proceed with caution and slow down to a reasonable, safe, and prudent speed given the safety conditions and posted speed limit. If workers are only present on one side of a multilane highway and safety conditions permit, the operator shall remain in or make a lane change into a lane farther away from the workers.

Authority of law enforcement. This section does not relieve the operator of an authorized law enforcement or emergency vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway or the authority of law enforcement to regulate traffic irrespective of the foregoing provisions.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

2001, No. 84

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 54;

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 36.

§ 1050a.
Authorized highway maintenance vehicles.

As used in this section, “authorized vehicle” means a vehicle authorized by the Agency of Transportation (in the case of State highways) or the municipality (in the case of town highways) to perform maintenance on a highway.

The driver of a vehicle shall yield the right of way to any authorized vehicle obviously and actually engaged in work upon a highway when the vehicle displays flashing lights meeting the requirements of subsection 1252(b) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 37.